Tennessee, session 114, SB0157.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-1-228(a), is amended by deleting
subdivision (3) and substituting instead the following:
(3) Other outcome indicators of student achievement that the department finds
to be reliable measures of school performance. If the department uses student
performance on a postsecondary readiness assessment, such as the ACT or SAT, as an
indicator of student achievement for purposes of this subdivision (a)(3), then:
(A) The department shall also use student performance on the career
readiness assessments described in § 49-6-6001(b)(4) as an indicator of student
achievement for purposes of this subdivision (a)(3); and
(B) If a student is administered a postsecondary readiness assessment
and a career readiness assessment, then the department shall only consider
student performance on the assessment for which the student achieved the
highest score for purposes of assigning a school letter grade.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to school grades issued for the 2025-2026 school year and subsequent school years.
SB0157
001109
- 1 -